Utah statutes.
17D-3-307.   Supervisor's election mailing list.

(1)  The commission and department shall establish and maintain for each conservation district a supervisor's election mailing list that contains the name and mailing address of each person eligible to vote in an election of board of supervisors members.

(2)  Before each election of board of supervisors members and if requested by the nominating committee under Subsection 17D-3-302(1), the commission shall deliver a copy of the supervisor's election mailing list to the nominating committee for the committee's review and approval.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

